uz_Latn_UZ/uz_Latn_UZ.aff
SFX J g kkanlaringnidir g
SFX J g kkanlaringnida g
SFX J g kkanlaringnidirda g
SFX J g kkanlaringnimikan g
SFX J g kkanlaringniku g
SFX J g kkanlaringga g
SFX J g kkanlaringgami g
SFX J g kkanlaringgadir g
SFX J g kkanlaringgada g
SFX J g kkanlaringgadirda g
SFX J g kkanlaringgamikan g
SFX J g kkanlaringgaku g
SFX J g kkanlaringdan g
SFX J g kkanlaringdanmi g
SFX J g kkanlaringdandir g
SFX J g kkanlaringdanda g
SFX J g kkanlaringdandirda g
SFX J g kkanlaringdanmikan g
SFX J g kkanlaringdanku g
SFX J g kkanlaringdami g
SFX J g kkanlaringdadir g
SFX J g kkanlaringdada g
SFX J g kkanlaringdadirda g
SFX J g kkanlaringdamikan g
SFX J g kkanlaringdaku g
SFX J g gmaganingni g
SFX J g gmaganingnimi g
SFX J g gmaganingnidir g
SFX J g gmaganingnida g
SFX J g gmaganingnidirda g
SFX J g gmaganingnimikan g
SFX J g gmaganingniku g
SFX J g gmaganingga g
SFX J g gmaganinggami g
SFX J g gmaganinggadir g
SFX J g gmaganinggada g
SFX J g gmaganinggadirda g
SFX J g gmaganinggamikan g
SFX J g gmaganinggaku g
SFX J g gmaganingdan g
SFX J g gmaganingdanmi g
SFX J g gmaganingdandir g
SFX J g gmaganingdanda g
SFX J g gmaganingdandirda g
SFX J g gmaganingdanmikan g
SFX J g gmaganingdanku g
SFX J g gmaganingdami g
SFX J g gmaganingdadir g
SFX J g gmaganingdada g
SFX J g gmaganingdadirda g
SFX J g gmaganingdamikan g
SFX J g gmaganingdaku g
SFX J g gmaganlaringni g
SFX J g gmaganlaringnimi g
SFX J g gmaganlaringnidir g
SFX J g gmaganlaringnida g
SFX J g gmaganlaringnidirda g
SFX J g gmaganlaringnimikan g
SFX J g gmaganlaringniku g
SFX J g gmaganlaringga g
SFX J g gmaganlaringgami g
SFX J g gmaganlaringgadir g
SFX J g gmaganlaringgada g
SFX J g gmaganlaringgadirda g
SFX J g gmaganlaringgamikan g
SFX J g gmaganlaringgaku g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdan g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdanmi g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdandir g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdanda g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdandirda g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdanmikan g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdanku g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdami g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdadir g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdada g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdadirda g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdamikan g
SFX J g gmaganlaringdaku g
SFX J 0 qaningni q
SFX J 0 qaningnimi q
SFX J 0 qaningnidir q
SFX J 0 qaningnida q
SFX J 0 qaningnidirda q
SFX J 0 qaningnimikan q
SFX J 0 qaningniku q
SFX J 0 qaningga q
SFX J 0 qaninggami q
SFX J 0 qaninggadir q
SFX J 0 qaninggada q
SFX J 0 qaninggadirda q
SFX J 0 qaninggamikan q
SFX J 0 qaninggaku q
SFX J 0 qaningdan q
SFX J 0 qaningdanmi q
SFX J 0 qaningdandir q
SFX J 0 qaningdanda q
SFX J 0 qaningdandirda q
SFX J 0 qaningdanmikan q
SFX J 0 qaningdanku q
SFX J 0 qaningdami q
SFX J 0 qaningdadir q
SFX J 0 qaningdada q
SFX J 0 qaningdadirda q
SFX J 0 qaningdamikan q
SFX J 0 qaningdaku q
SFX J 0 qanlaringni q
SFX J 0 qanlaringnimi q
SFX J 0 qanlaringnidir q
SFX J 0 qanlaringnida q
SFX J 0 qanlaringnidirda q
SFX J 0 qanlaringnimikan q
SFX J 0 qanlaringniku q
SFX J 0 qanlaringga q
SFX J 0 qanlaringgami q
SFX J 0 qanlaringgadir q
SFX J 0 qanlaringgada q
SFX J 0 qanlaringgadirda q
SFX J 0 qanlaringgamikan q
SFX J 0 qanlaringgaku q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdan q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdanmi q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdandir q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdanda q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdandirda q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdanmikan q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdanku q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdami q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdadir q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdada q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdadirda q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdamikan q
SFX J 0 qanlaringdaku q
SFX J 0 maganingni q
SFX J 0 maganingnimi q
SFX J 0 maganingnidir q
SFX J 0 maganingnida q
SFX J 0 maganingnidirda q
SFX J 0 maganingnimikan q
SFX J 0 maganingniku q
SFX J 0 maganingga q
SFX J 0 maganinggami q
SFX J 0 maganinggadir q
SFX J 0 maganinggada q
SFX J 0 maganinggadirda q
SFX J 0 maganinggamikan q
SFX J 0 maganinggaku q
SFX J 0 maganingdan q
SFX J 0 maganingdanmi q
SFX J 0 maganingdandir q
SFX J 0 maganingdanda q
SFX J 0 maganingdandirda q
SFX J 0 maganingdanmikan q
SFX J 0 maganingdanku q
SFX J 0 maganingdami q
SFX J 0 maganingdadir q
SFX J 0 maganingdada q
SFX J 0 maganingdadirda q
SFX J 0 maganingdamikan q
SFX J 0 maganingdaku q
SFX J 0 maganlaringni q
SFX J 0 maganlaringnimi q
SFX J 0 maganlaringnidir q
SFX J 0 maganlaringnida q
SFX J 0 maganlaringnidirda q
SFX J 0 maganlaringnimikan q
SFX J 0 maganlaringniku q
SFX J 0 maganlaringga q
SFX J 0 maganlaringgami q
SFX J 0 maganlaringgadir q
SFX J 0 maganlaringgada q
SFX J 0 maganlaringgadirda q
SFX J 0 maganlaringgamikan q
SFX J 0 maganlaringgaku q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdan q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdanmi q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdandir q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdanda q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdandirda q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdanmikan q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdanku q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdami q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdadir q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdada q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdadirda q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdamikan q
SFX J 0 maganlaringdaku q
SFX J 0 ganingni [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingnimi [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingnidir [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingnida [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingnidirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingnimikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingniku [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingga [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganinggami [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganinggadir [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganinggada [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganinggadirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganinggamikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganinggaku [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdandir [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdandirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdanmikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdami [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdadir [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdada [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdadirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdamikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganingdaku [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringni [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringnimi [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringnidir [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringnida [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringnidirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringnimikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringniku [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringga [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringgami [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringgadir [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringgada [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringgadirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringgamikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringgaku [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdandir [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdandirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdanmikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdami [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdadir [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdada [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdadirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdamikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 ganlaringdaku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingni [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingnimi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingnidir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingnida [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingnidirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingnimikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingniku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingga [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganinggami [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganinggadir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganinggada [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganinggadirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganinggamikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganinggaku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdandir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdandirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdanmikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdami [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdadir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdada [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdadirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdamikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganingdaku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringni [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringnimi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringnidir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringnida [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringnidirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringnimikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringniku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringga [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringgami [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringgadir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringgada [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringgadirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringgamikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringgaku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdandir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdandirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdanmikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdami [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdadir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdada [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdadirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdamikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlaringdaku [^gq]
SFX J g kkanlik g
SFX J g gmaganlik g
SFX J 0 qanlik q
SFX J 0 maganlik q
SFX J 0 ganlik [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganlik [^gq]
SFX J g kkanligim g
SFX J g kkanligimni g
SFX J g kkanligimning g
SFX J g kkanligimga g
SFX J g kkanligimdan g
SFX J g kkanligimda g
SFX J g kkanligimman g
SFX J g kkanligimsan g
SFX J g kkanligimmiz g
SFX J g kkanligimsiz g
SFX J g kkanligimlar g
SFX J g kkanligimsizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimmasman g
SFX J g kkanligimmassan g
SFX J g kkanligimmas g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmassiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmaslar g
SFX J g kkanligimmassizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimmanmi g
SFX J g kkanligimmisan g
SFX J g kkanligimmi g
SFX J g kkanligimmizmi g
SFX J g kkanligimmisiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmilar g
SFX J g kkanligimmisizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmanmi g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmisan g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmi g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmizmi g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmisiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmilar g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmisizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimmanku g
SFX J g kkanligimsanku g
SFX J g kkanligimku g
SFX J g kkanligimmizku g
SFX J g kkanligimsizku g
SFX J g kkanligimlarku g
SFX J g kkanligimsizlarku g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmanku g
SFX J g kkanligimmassanku g
SFX J g kkanligimmasku g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmizku g
SFX J g kkanligimmassizku g
SFX J g kkanligimmaslarku g
SFX J g kkanligimmassizlarku g
SFX J g kkanligimmikanman g
SFX J g kkanligimmikansan g
SFX J g kkanligimmikan g
SFX J g kkanligimmikanmiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmikansiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmikanmilar g
SFX J g kkanligimmikanmisizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimdirman g
SFX J g kkanligimdirsan g
SFX J g kkanligimdir g
SFX J g kkanligimdirmiz g
SFX J g kkanligimdirsiz g
SFX J g kkanligimdirlar g
SFX J g kkanligimdirsizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirman g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirsan g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdir g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirmiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirsiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirlar g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirsizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimdirmanda g
SFX J g kkanligimdirsanda g
SFX J g kkanligimdirda g
SFX J g kkanligimdirmizda g
SFX J g kkanligimdirsizda g
SFX J g kkanligimdirlarda g
SFX J g kkanligimdirsizlarda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirmanda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirsanda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirmizda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirsizda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirlarda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasdirsizlarda g
SFX J g kkanligimmidim g
SFX J g kkanligimmiding g
SFX J g kkanligimmidi g
SFX J g kkanligimmidik g
SFX J g kkanligimmidingiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmidilar g
SFX J g kkanligimmidingizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmidim g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmiding g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmidi g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmidik g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmidingiz g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmidilar g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmidingizlar g
SFX J g kkanligimmanda g
SFX J g kkanligimsanda g
SFX J g kkanligimmizda g
SFX J g kkanligimsizda g
SFX J g kkanligimlarda g
SFX J g kkanligimsizlarda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmanda g
SFX J g kkanligimmassanda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasda g
SFX J g kkanligimmasmizda g
SFX J g kkanligimmassizda g
SFX J g kkanligimmaslarda g
SFX J g kkanligimmassizlarda g
SFX J g kkanligim-chi g
SFX J g kkanliging g
SFX J g kkanligingni g
SFX J g kkanligingning g
SFX J g kkanligingga g
SFX J g kkanligingdan g
SFX J g kkanligingda g
SFX J g kkanligingman g
SFX J g kkanligingsan g
SFX J g kkanligingmiz g
SFX J g kkanligingsiz g
SFX J g kkanliginglar g
SFX J g kkanligingsizlar g
SFX J g kkanligingmasman g
SFX J g kkanligingmassan g
SFX J g kkanligingmas g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmiz g
SFX J g kkanligingmassiz g
SFX J g kkanligingmaslar g
SFX J g kkanligingmassizlar g
SFX J g kkanligingmanmi g
SFX J g kkanligingmisan g
SFX J g kkanligingmi g
SFX J g kkanligingmizmi g
SFX J g kkanligingmisiz g
SFX J g kkanligingmilar g
SFX J g kkanligingmisizlar g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmanmi g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmisan g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmi g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmizmi g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmisiz g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmilar g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmisizlar g
SFX J g kkanligingmanku g
SFX J g kkanligingsanku g
SFX J g kkanligingku g
SFX J g kkanligingmizku g
SFX J g kkanligingsizku g
SFX J g kkanliginglarku g
SFX J g kkanligingsizlarku g
SFX J g kkanligingmasmanku g
